Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3262.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 28 O.S. 2021, Section 153, as last
amended by Section 5, Chapter 305, O.S.L. 2025 (28 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 153), is amended to read as follows:
Section 153. A. The clerks of the courts shall collect as
costs in every criminal case for each offense of which the defendant
is convicted, irrespective of whether or not the sentence is
deferred, the following flat charges and no more, except for
standing and parking violations and for charges otherwise provided
for by law, which fee shall cover docketing of the case, filing of
all papers, issuance of process, warrants, orders, and other
services to the date of judgment:
1. For each defendant convicted of
exceeding the speed limit by at least
one (1) mile per hour but not more than
ten (10) miles per hour, whether charged
individually or conjointly with others...............$77.00

2. For each defendant convicted of a
misdemeanor traffic violation other than
an offense provided for in paragraph 1
or 5 of this subsection, whether charged
individually or conjointly with others...............$98.00
3. For each defendant convicted of a
misdemeanor, other than for driving
under the influence of alcohol or other
intoxicating substance or an offense
provided for in paragraph 1 or 2 of this
subsection, whether charged individually
or conjointly with others............................$93.00
4. For each defendant convicted of a
felony, other than for driving under the
influence of alcohol or other
intoxicating substance, whether charged
individually or conjointly with others..............$103.00
5. For each defendant convicted of the
misdemeanor of driving under the
influence of alcohol or other
intoxicating substance, whether charged
individually or conjointly with others..............$433.00
6. For each defendant convicted of the
felony of driving under the influence of
alcohol or other intoxicating substance,
whether charged individually or
conjointly with others..............................$433.00
7. For the services of a court reporter at
each preliminary hearing and trial held
in the case..........................................$20.00
8. For each time a jury is requested....................$30.00
9. A sheriff’s fee for serving or
endeavoring to serve each writ, warrant,
order, process, command, or notice or
pursuing any fugitive from justice
a. within the county up to.......... $50.00 $100.00, or
ENR. H. B. NO. 3262 Page 2

mileage as
established by the
Oklahoma Statutes,
whichever is
greater, or
b. outside of the county up to...... $50.00 $100.00, or
actual, necessary
expenses, whichever
is greater
B. In addition to the amount collected pursuant to paragraphs 2
through 6 of subsection A of this section, the sum of Six Dollars
($6.00) shall be assessed and credited to the Law Library Fund
pursuant to Section 1201 et seq. of Title 20 of the Oklahoma
Statutes.
C. In addition to the amount collected pursuant to subsection A
of this section, the sum of Twenty Dollars ($20.00) shall be
assessed and collected in every traffic case for each offense other
than for driving under the influence of alcohol or other
intoxicating substance; the sum of Thirty Dollars ($30.00) shall be
assessed and collected in every misdemeanor case for each offense;
the sum of Thirty Dollars ($30.00) shall be assessed and collected
in every misdemeanor case for each offense for driving under the
influence of alcohol or other intoxicating substance; the sum of
Fifty Dollars ($50.00) shall be assessed and collected in every
felony case for each offense; and the sum of Fifty Dollars ($50.00)
shall be assessed and collected in every felony case for each
offense for driving under the influence of alcohol or other
intoxicating substance.
D. In addition to the amounts collected pursuant to subsections
A and B of this section, the sum of Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00)
shall be assessed and credited to the Oklahoma Court Information
System Revolving Fund created pursuant to Section 1315 of Title 20
of the Oklahoma Statutes.
E. In addition to the amount collected pursuant to paragraphs 1
through 6 of subsection A of this section, the sum of Ten Dollars
($10.00) shall be assessed and credited to the Sheriff’s Service Fee
Account in the county in which the conviction occurred for the
purpose of enhancing existing or providing additional courthouse
security.
ENR. H. B. NO. 3262 Page 3

F. In addition to the amounts collected pursuant to paragraphs
1 through 6 of subsection A of this section, the sum of Three
Dollars ($3.00) shall be assessed and credited to the Office of the
Attorney General Victim Services Unit.
G. In addition to the amounts collected pursuant to paragraphs
1 through 6 of subsection A of this section, the sum of Three
Dollars ($3.00) shall be assessed and credited to the Child Abuse
Multidisciplinary Account. This fee shall not be used for purposes
of hiring or employing any law enforcement officers.
H. Prior to conviction, parties in criminal cases shall not be
required to pay, advance, or post security for the issuance or
service of process to obtain compulsory attendance of witnesses.
I. The amounts to be assessed as court costs upon filing of a
case shall be those amounts above-stated in paragraph 3 or 4 of
subsection A and subsections B, C, D and E of this section.
J. The fees collected pursuant to this section shall be
deposited into the court fund, except the following:
1. A court clerk issuing a misdemeanor warrant is entitled to
ten percent (10%) of the sheriff’s service fee, provided for in
paragraph 9 of subsection A of this section, collected on a warrant
referred to the contractor for the misdemeanor warrant notification
program governed by Sections 514.4 and 514.5 of Title 19 of the
Oklahoma Statutes. This ten-percent sum shall be deposited into the
issuing Court Clerk’s Revolving Fund, created pursuant to Section
220 of Title 19 of the Oklahoma Statutes, of the court clerk issuing
the warrant with the balance of the sheriff’s service fee to be
deposited into the Sheriff’s Service Fee Account, created pursuant
to the provisions of Section 514.1 of Title 19 of the Oklahoma
Statutes, of the sheriff in the county in which service is made or
attempted. Otherwise, the sheriff’s service fee, when collected,
shall be deposited in its entirety into the Sheriff’s Service Fee
Account of the sheriff in the county in which service is made or
attempted;
2. The sheriff’s fee provided for in Section 153.2 of this
title;
3. The witness fees paid by the district attorney pursuant to
the provisions of Section 82 of this title which, if collected by
ENR. H. B. NO. 3262 Page 4

the court clerk, shall be transferred to the district attorney’s
office in the county where witness attendance was required. Fees
transferred pursuant to this paragraph shall be deposited in the
district attorney’s maintenance and operating expense account;
4. The fees provided for in subsection C of this section shall
be forwarded to the District Attorneys Council Revolving Fund to
defray the costs of prosecution; and
5. The following amounts of the fees provided for in paragraphs
2, 3, 5 and 6 of subsection A of this section, when collected, shall
be deposited in the Trauma Care Assistance Revolving Fund, created
pursuant to the provisions of Section 1-2530.9 of Title 63 of the
Oklahoma Statutes:
a. Ten Dollars ($10.00) of the ninety-eight-dollar fee
provided for in paragraph 2 of subsection A of this
section,
b. Ten Dollars ($10.00) of the ninety-three-dollar fee
provided for in paragraph 3 of subsection A of this
section,
c. One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) of the four-hundred-
thirty-three-dollar fee provided for in paragraph 5 of
subsection A of this section, and
d. One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) of the four-hundred-
thirty-three-dollar fee provided for in paragraph 6 of
subsection A of this section.
K. As used in this section, “convicted” means any final
adjudication of guilt, whether pursuant to a plea of guilty or nolo
contendere or otherwise, and any deferred judgment or suspended
sentence.
L. A court clerk may accept in payment for any fee, fine,
forfeiture payment, cost, penalty assessment or other charge or
collection to be assessed or collected by a court clerk pursuant to
this section a nationally recognized credit card or debit card or
other electronic payment method as provided in paragraph 1 of
subsection B of Section 151 of this title.
ENR. H. B. NO. 3262 Page 5

M. Upon receipt of payment of fines and costs for offenses
charged prior to July 1, 1992, the court clerk shall apportion and
pay Thirteen Dollars ($13.00) per conviction to the court fund.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 28 O.S. 2021, Section 162, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 162. A. The clerks of the courts shall collect as
costs in every juvenile delinquency, child in need of supervision,
or deprived case in which the juvenile is adjudicated, irrespective
of whether or not the sentence is deferred, or minor in need of
treatment case pursuant to the Inpatient Mental Health and Substance
Abuse Treatment of Minors Act, Section 5-501 et seq. of Title 43A of
the Oklahoma Statutes, irrespective of whether the child is
committed for inpatient mental health or substance abuse treatment,
or in every such case in which a petition is filed at the demand of
the parents of a juvenile and said petition is subsequently
dismissed prior to adjudication at said parents’ request, the
following flat charge and no more, except for the charges provided
for in this section, which fee shall cover docketing of the case,
filing of all papers, issuance of process, warrants and orders, and
other services to date of judgment:
For each case where one or more juveniles
are adjudicated deprived..................................$50.00
For each juvenile who is certified to stand
trial as an adult.........................................$75.00
In each juvenile case wherein parental
rights are terminated.....................................$50.00
For each juvenile adjudicated in need of
supervision...............................................$50.00
For each child found to be a minor in need
of treatment..............................................$50.00
For each juvenile adjudicated for an
offense which would be a misdemeanor if
committed by an adult, including
violation of any traffic law, whether
charged individually or conjointly with
others....................................................$50.00
ENR. H. B. NO. 3262 Page 6

For each juvenile adjudicated for an
offense which would be a felony if
committed by an adult, whether charged
individually or conjointly with others....................$75.00
For the services of a court reporter at
each trial held in the case...............................$20.00
When a jury is requested....................................$30.00
A sheriff’s fee for serving or endeavoring
to serve all writs, warrants, orders,
process, commands, or notices or pursuing
any fugitive from justice up to...........................$20.00
$100.00 or
mileage as established
by Oklahoma Statutes,
whichever is greater.
B. In addition to the amount collected pursuant to subsection A
of this section, the sum of Thirty Dollars ($30.00) shall be
assessed and collected for each juvenile case. The fees collected
shall be forwarded to the District Attorneys Revolving Fund to
defray the costs of prosecution.
C. Costs assessed pursuant to subsections A and B of this
section shall be levied against the juvenile, the parent, or both,
but shall not be levied against the legal guardian or any state or
private agency having custody of any juvenile subject to such
proceedings.
D. Prior to adjudication, parties in juvenile delinquency,
child in need of supervision, minor in need of treatment, and
deprived cases shall not be required to pay, advance, or post
security for the issuance or service of process to obtain compulsory
attendance of witnesses. These fees shall be deposited into the
court fund, except the sheriff’s fee, when collected, shall be
transferred to the general fund of the county in which service is
made or attempted to be made.
E. The clerk of the district court shall charge the sum of One
Hundred Dollars ($100.00) for preparing, assembling, indexing, and
transmitting the record for appellate review. This fee shall be
ENR. H. B. NO. 3262 Page 7

paid by the party taking the appeal and shall be entered as costs in
the action. If more than one party to the action shall prosecute an
appeal from the same judgment or order, the fee shall be paid by the
party whose petition in error is determined by the district court or
by the appellate court to commence the principal appeal. The fees
collected hereunder shall be paid into the court fund.
F. Fees and costs collected in juvenile cases may be withdrawn
from the court fund and used for operations of the juvenile bureaus,
in counties wherein a statutory juvenile bureau is in operation,
upon approval by the Chief Justice of the Oklahoma Supreme Court.
G. In those seventy-four counties in which court services are
provided by contract between the Oklahoma Supreme Court and the
Department of Human Services, funds received from court costs in
juvenile cases may be withdrawn from the court fund and paid to the
Department of Human Services upon approval by the Chief Justice of
the Oklahoma Supreme Court. Said funds are to be expended by the
Department of Human Services to supplement community-based programs,
such as youth services programs, day treatment programs and group
home services. Specific annual training of Department workers in
community-based services providing the above court-related services
is also to be included for expenditure of funds received from court
costs in juvenile cases by the Department of Human Services.
H. In those seventy-four counties in which court services are
provided by contract between the Oklahoma Supreme Court and the
Office of Juvenile Affairs, funds received from court costs or
orders for care and maintenance in juvenile cases may be withdrawn
from the court fund and paid to the Office of Juvenile Affairs upon
approval by the Chief Justice of the Oklahoma Supreme Court. Said
funds are to be expended by the Office of Juvenile Affairs to
provide care and maintenance and to supplement community-based
programs, such as alternative education, juvenile offender community
and victim restitution work programs, community sanction programs,
youth services programs, day treatment programs, group home
services, and detention services. Specific annual training of
agency workers in community-based services providing the above
court-related services is also to be included for expenditure of
funds received from court costs in juvenile cases by the Office of
Juvenile Affairs.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
ENR. H. B. NO. 3262 Page 8

Passed the House of Representatives the 6th day of May, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 4th day of May, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 3262 Page 9